pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Auxiliares de sono > Auxiliares para apneia no sono e ressonar: Sprays e pastilhas anti-ressonar; Tiras nasais externas; Dispositivos de suporte ao maxilar; Dispositivos de avanço mandibular (DAM); Fita bucal; Clipes nasais; Dilatadores nasais; Auxiliares de sono posicionais; Dispositivos de retenção da língua
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Produse pentru dormit > Produse pentru sforăit și apnee în somn: Sprayuri și pastile anti-sforăit; Benzi nazale externe; Dispozitive pentru maxilare; Dispozitive pentru împingerea mandibulei (MAD); Bandă pentru gură; Cleme nazale; Conuri nazale; Ajutoare pentru poziționare în somn; Dispozitive pentru imobilizarea limbii (TRD)
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Aides au sommeil > Solutions pour ronflements et apnée du sommeil: Sprays et pastilles anti-ronflement; Bandelettes nasales externes; Dispositifs de support de mâchoire; Dispositifs d’avancement mandibulaire (MAD); Bandes adhésives pour la bouche; Pinces nasales; Cônes nasaux; Dispositifs de positionnement du sommeil; Dispositifs de retenue de la langue (TRD)
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Sleeping Aids > Snoring & Sleep Apnea Aids: Anti-Snoring Sprays & Lozenges; External Nasal Strips; Jaw Support Devices; Mandibular Advancement Devices (MAD); Mouth Tape; Nasal Clips; Nasal Cones; Positional Sleep Aids; Tongue Retaining Devices (TRD)
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Sredstva za pomoć pri spavanju > Sredstva za pomoć kod hrkanja i apneje: Sprejevi i pastile protiv hrkanja; Vanjske trake za nos; Naprave za potporu čeljusti; Udlage za donju čeljust (MAD); Trake za usta; Kopče za nos; Konusi za nos; Pomagala za položaj tijekom spavanja; Naprave za držanje jezika (TRD)
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Βοηθήματα ύπνου > Βοηθήματα για ροχαλητό και άπνοια κατά τον ύπνο: Σπρέι και παστίλιες κατά του ροχαλητού; Εξωτερικές ρινικές λωρίδες; Συσκευές υποστήριξης της γνάθου; Συσκευές προώθησης κάτω γνάθου (MAD); Ταινία στόματος; Κλιπ ρινικής κοιλότητας; Κώνοι ρινικής οδού; Βοηθήματα ύπνου θέσης; Συσκευές συγκράτησης γλώσσας (TRD)
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Sovemidler > Hjælpemidler mod snorken og søvnapnø: Anti-snorkesprays og -pastiller; Eksterne næsestrimler; Kæbestøtteenheder; Mandibulære fremføringsanordninger (MAD); Mundtape; Næseclips; Næsekegler; Hjælpemidler til søvnstilling; Tungefastholdelsesanordninger (TRD)
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Ausili per il sonno > Rimedi contro russamento e apnea nel sonno: Spray e caramelle anti-russamento; Cerottini per naso esterni; Dispositivi di supporto per mascella; Dispositivi di avanzamento mandibolare (MAD); Nastro per la bocca; Clip nasali; Coni nasali; Ausili per il sonno posizionale; Dispositivi di trattenimento della lingua (TRD)
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Alvássegítők > Horkolás és alvási apnoe elleni szerek: Horkolásgátló spray-k és pasztillák; Külső orrcsíkok; Állkapocstámogató eszközök; Állcsontelőremozdító készülék (MAD); Szájtapasz; Orrkapcsok; Orrkúpok; Pozicionális alvási segédeszközök; Nyelvtartó eszközök (TRD)
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Søvnhjelp > Hjelp mot snorking og søvnapné: Sprayer og sugetabletter mot snorking; Utvendige nesetrips; Kjevestøtteenheter; Mandibular Advancement Devices (MAD); Munntape; Neseklips; Nesekjegler; Posisjonskontroll-hjelpemidler for søvn; Tongue Retaining Devices (TRD)
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 睡眠輔助用品 > 睡眠打鼾和呼吸中止症輔助器: 止鼾噴霧及錠劑; 通氣鼻貼; 下顎支撐器; 抑鼾器 (MAD); 口腔膠帶; 鼻夾; 鼻竇擴張器; 姿勢睡眠輔助; 持舌器 (TRD)
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > 安眠グッズ > いびき・睡眠時無呼吸対策グッズ: いびき防止スプレーとトローチ; ノーズストリップ; 顎サポート器具; 下顎前方移動装置（MAD）; マウステープ; ノーズクリップ; ノーズコーン; 体位性睡眠補助具; 舌保持装置（TRD）
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Slaapmiddelen > Hulpmiddelen bij snurken en slaapapneu: Anti-snurk sprays en zuigtabletten; Externe neusstrips; Kaakondersteuningsapparaten; Mandibulaire repositie-apparaten (MRA); Mond tape; Neusklemmen; Neuskegels; Positionele slaap hulpmiddelen; Tongklemapparaten
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Auxiliares do sono > Soluções para o ronco e a apneia do sono: Sprays e pastilhas antirronco; Tiras nasais externas; Dispositivos de suporte de mandíbula; Dispositivos de avanço mandibular (MAD); Fita para boca; Clipes nasais; Cones nasais; Auxílios de sono posicional; Dispositivos de retenção de língua (TRD)
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Środki ułatwiające zasypianie > Środki przeciwko chrapaniu i bezdechowi sennemu: Spraye i pastylki przeciw chrapaniu; Zewnętrzne paski do nosa; Urządzenia wspierające szczękę; Urządzenia do korekcji ułożenia żuchwy (MAD); Taśma na usta; Klipsy do nosa; Stożki nosowe; Pomoce do snu pozycyjnego; Urządzenia podtrzymujące język (TRD)
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Sömnmedel > Hjälp mot snarkning och sömnapné: Anti-snarksprayer och sugtabletter; Externa näsremsor; Käkstödsenheter; Underkäksutvecklingsanordningar (MAD); Muntejp; Näsklämmor; Näskoner; Positionshjälpmedel för sömn; Tunghållningsanordningar (TRD)
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 수면 보조 기구 > 코골이/수면 무호흡 교정 장치: 코골이 방지 스프레이 및 로젠지; 외용 코 스트립; 턱 교정장치; 하악전진장치(MAD); 입 테이프; 코골이방지 클립; 코골이방지 콘; 수면 자세 보조 기구; 혀견인장치(TRD)
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Uyumaya Yardımcı Ürünler > Horlama ve Uyku Apnesi Çözümleri: Horlama Önleyici Spreyler ve Pastiller; Dış Burun Bantları; Çene Destek Cihazları; Mandibular İlerleme Cihazları (MAD); Ağız Bandı; Burun Klipleri; Burun Konileri; Pozisyonel Uyku Yardımcıları; Dil Tutma Cihazları (TRD)
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > อุปกรณ์ช่วยให้นอนหลับ > อุปกรณ์ลดการกรนและการหยุดหายใจขณะหลับ: สเปรย์และเม็ดอมป้องกันนอนกรน; แถบแปะจมูกภายนอก; อุปกรณ์พยุงขากรรไกร; อุปกรณ์เลื่อนขากรรไกรล่างมาด้านหน้า (MAD); เทปปิดปาก; คลิปบีบจมูก; กรวยสอดจมูก; อุปกรณ์ช่วยปรับท่านอน; อุปกรณ์รักษาสภาพลิ้น (TRD)
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Pagalbinės miego priemonės > Pagalbinės priemonės nuo knarkimo ir miego apnėjos: Priešknarkimo purškalai ir pastilės; Išorinės nosies juostelės; Žandikaulio palaikymo įrenginiai; Apatinio žandikaulio padėtį keičiantys įtaisai; Burnos juosta; Nosies spaustukai; Nosies kūgiai; Padėties miego pagalbos priemonės; Liežuvio laikymo įtaisai (TRD)
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Schlafhilfen > Hilfsmittel gegen Schnarchen und Schlaf-Apnoe: Anti-Schnarch-Sprays & Lutschtabletten; Nasenstreifen; Kinnriemen; Vorschubschiene (MAD); Mundpflaster; Nasenklammern; Nasenspreizer; Positionelle Schlafhilfen; Zungenhaltevorrichtungen (TRD)
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Apua nukahtamiseen > Apuvälineet kuorsaukseen ja uniapneaan: Kuorsauksenestosuihke ja -pastilli; Ulkoiset nenänauhat; Leuan tukilaitteet; Alaleukakiskot; Suunsuljentateippi; Nenäklipsit; Sierainten laajentajat; Asentohoitoapuväline; Kielipidikkeet
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Помощни средства за сън > Помощни средства за хъркане и сънна апнея: Спрейове и таблетки против хъркане; Външни ленти за нос; Устройства за поддържане на челюстта; Устройства за мандибуларно напредване (MAD); Лепенка за уста; Щипки за нос; Протези за нос; Помощни средства за пози за сън; Помощни средства за задържане на езика (TRD)
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Товары для нормализации сна > Средства против храпа и апноэ во сне: Спреи и леденцы против храпа; Наружные носорасширители; Бандажи для поддержки челюсти; Устройства для выдвижения нижней челюсти; Пластырь для рта; Клипсы для носа; Внутренние носорасширители; Позиционные средства для сна; Устройства для фиксации языка
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Pomôcky na spanie > Pomôcky pri chrápaní a spánkovom apnoe: Spreje a pastilky proti chrápaniu; Vonkajšie nosové prúžky; Pomôcky na podporu čeľustí; Pomôcky pri chrápaní a spánkovom apnoe (MAD); Pásky na ústa; Nosové klipy; Nosové kužele; Polohové pomôcky na spánok; Pomôcky na uchytenie jazyka (TRD)
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ giấc ngủ > Thiết bị/ dụng cụ hỗ trợ điều trị hội chứng ngừng thở và ngáy khi ngủ: Xịt và viên ngậm chống ngáy; Miếng dán ngoài mũi; Thiết bị đỡ hàm; Thiết bị nâng cao hàm dưới (MAD); Băng dán miệng; Kẹp mũi; Nút thông mũi; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tư thế ngủ; Thiết bị giữ lưỡi (TRD)
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Pripomočki za spanje > Pripomočki za smrčanje in apnejo v spanju: Razpršila in pastile proti smrčanju; Zunanji nosni trakovi; Naprave za podporo čeljusti; Naprave za premikanje spodnje čeljusti; Trakovi za usta; Nosne sponke; Nosni čepki; Pomožna sredstva za položaj pri spanju; Naprave za zadrževanje jezika
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 助眠用品 > 止鼾/睡眠呼吸暂停辅助用品: 止鼾喷雾与含片; 外用通气鼻贴; 下颌支撑装置; 下颌前移装置 (MAD); 睡眠口贴; 鼻夹; 锥形鼻塞; 睡姿辅助器; 舌保持器 (TRD)
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Pomůcky na zlepšení spánku > Pomůcky proti chrápání a spánkové apnoe: Spreje a pastilky proti chrápání; Pásky na nos proti chrápání; Čelistní podpěry; Zařízení MAD (Mandibular Advancement Devices); Pásky na ústa; Nosní klipy; Špunty do nosu; Poziční pomůcky na spaní; Zařízení pro upevnění jazyka (TRD)
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Ayudas para conciliar el sueño > Ayudas para ronquidos y apnea de sueño: Aerosoles y pastillas anti-ronquidos; Tiras nasales externas; Dispositivos de apoyo mandibular; Dispositivos de avance mandibular (MAD); Cinta para la boca; Clips nasales; Conos nasales; Ayudas posicionales para dormir; Dispositivos de retención lingual (TRD)